Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-102
County seal; use.

The board shall procure and keep a seal, with such emblems and devices as it may think proper, which may be either an engraved or ink stamp seal and which shall be the seal of the county, and no other seal shall be used by the county clerk, except where the county clerk is ex officio clerk of the district court, in which case he shall use the seal of said court in all matters and proceedings therein. The impression or representation of said seal by stamp shall be a sufficient sealing in all cases where sealing is required.

Laws 1879, § 46, p. 368;

R.S.1913, § 949;

C.S.1922, § 849;

C.S.1929, § 26-102;

R.S.1943, § 23-102;

Laws 1971, LB 653, § 2.